Utah statutes.
31A-33-112.   Withdrawal of policyholders.

Any policyholder may, upon complying with Section 31A-22-1002, withdraw from the Workers' Compensation Fund by providing an advance written notice of his intent to cancel.  The policyholder shall remain liable for any unpaid premium for periods of coverage prior to cancellation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 240, 1996 General Session

